Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.420

Alternative direct petition method—Petition—Signers—Content.

(1) A petition for annexation of an area contiguous to a city or town may be made in writing addressed to and filed with the legislative body of the municipality to which annexation is desired. Except where all the property sought to be annexed is property of a school district, and the school directors thereof file the petition for annexation as in RCW 28A.335.110, the petition must be signed by the owners of a majority of the acreage for which annexation is petitioned and a majority of the registered voters residing in the area for which annexation is petitioned.

(2) If no residents exist within the area proposed for annexation, the petition must be signed by the owners of a majority of the acreage for which annexation is petitioned.

(3) The petition shall set forth a legal description of the property proposed to be annexed that complies with RCW 35.02.170, and shall be accompanied by a drawing that outlines the boundaries of the property sought to be annexed. If the legislative body has required the assumption of all or any portion of city or town indebtedness by the area annexed, and/or the adoption of a comprehensive plan for the area to be annexed, these facts, together with a quotation of the minute entry of such requirement or requirements, shall be set forth in the petition.

[ 2003 c 331 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 331: See notes following RCW 35.13.410.